Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-723.01
Justice or judge; disqualification without loss of salary; Supreme Court order; when.

Upon order of the Supreme Court, a Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge shall be disqualified from acting as a Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge, without loss of salary, while there is pending (1) an indictment or information charging him or her in the United States with a crime punishable as a felony under Nebraska or federal law or (2) a recommendation to the Supreme Court by the Commission on Judicial Qualifications for his or her removal or retirement.

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 9.